Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB676.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 504.120 is amended to read as follows:
In cases in which the defendant provides evidence at trial of his or her mental illness or
insanity at the time of the offense, the jury or court may find the defendant:
(1) Guilty;
(2) Not guilty;
(3) Not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the offense; or
(4) Guilty but mentally ill at the time of the offense.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:02 PM Jacketed